Massachusetts, session 194th, H2509.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby 
amended by adding the following section:- 
Section 245. (a) The department shall, in consultation with the board of registration in 
pharmacy, the division of insurance, the office of Medicaid and the Massachusetts emergency 
management agency, develop and publicize a statewide plan for ensuring the availability of 
prescription medications during a state of emergency declared by the governor. The plan shall, at 
a minimum: 

of 2 8  (1) allow for early refills of prescriptions, if the current amount that a patient possesses is 
not expected to last beyond 10 days of the date of the declaration of emergency; provided, 
however, that a pharmacist shall confirm such prescription with the prescriber before each refill; 
(2) ensure that vehicles delivering medications to pharmacies and hospitals shall be given 
the same road access available to other emergency vehicles; 
(3) coordinate among pharmaceutical manufacturers, wholesalers, distributors, 
pharmacists and other industry stakeholders; 
(4) avoid duplicative or redundant supply chain infrastructure; and 
(5) create a safety net system, including a toll-free telephone number and a website for 
persons to contact during the emergency for assistance in locating prescription medication, in the 
event no medications are available to them locally. 
(b) If the governor declares a state of emergency pursuant to section 2A, chapter 639 of 
the acts of 1950, or any other applicable law, the commissioner shall implement the statewide 
plan for ensuring the availability of prescription medications for the duration of the state of 
emergency.